src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_haaitis_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - hääitis: # 2A v-k-v, t->tt, ää->á, i >á, VV > V A_VEESKIR
    hääitis+A+Sg+Nom: hääitis
    hääitis+A+Attr: häitis 
    hääitis+A+Sg+Gen: háittás
    hääitis+A+Sg+Acc: háittás
    hääitis+A+Sg+Ill: háittásân
    hääitis+A+Sg+Loc: háittásist
    hääitis+A+Sg+Com: háittásáin
    hääitis+A+Sg+Abe: háittásttáá
    hääitis+A+Ess: häitisin
    hääitis+A+Par: häitisid
    hääitis+A+Pl+Nom: háittáseh
    hääitis+A+Pl+Gen: háittásij
    hääitis+A+Pl+Acc: háittásijd
    hääitis+A+Pl+Ill: háittásáid
    hääitis+A+Pl+Loc: háittásijn
    hääitis+A+Pl+Com: [háittásijguin, háittásijgijn]
    hääitis+A+Pl+Abe: háittásijttáá

    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: háittásub
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: háittásub
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc: háittásub
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: háittásubon
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: háittásubboost
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: háittásubboin
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: háittásubttáá
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: háittásuboh
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: háittásuboi
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: háittásuboid # -boid
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: háittásubboid
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: háittásuboin
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [háittásuboiguin, háittásuboigijn]
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: háittásuboittáá
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: háittásubbon
    hääitis+A+Der/Comp+A+Par: háittásubbod

    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: háittásumos
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: háittásumos
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: háittásumos
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: háittásumosân
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: háittásumosist
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: háittásumosáin
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: háittásumosttáá
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: háittásumoseh
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: háittásumosij
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: háittásumosijd
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: háittásumosáid
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: háittásumosijn
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [háittásumosijguin, háittásumosijgijn]
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: háittásumosijttáá
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: háittásumosin
    hääitis+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: háittásumosid
